Utah statutes.
26-8a-409.   Ground ambulance and paramedic licenses -- Hearing and presiding officers.

(1)  The department shall set certification and training standards for hearing officers and presiding officers.

(2)  At a minimum, a presiding officer shall:

(a)  be familiar with the theory and application of public convenience and necessity; and

(b)  have a working knowledge of the emergency medical service system in the state.

(3)  In addition to the requirements in Subsection (2), a hearing officer shall also be licensed to practice law in the state.

(4)  The department shall provide training for hearing officer and presiding officer candidates in the theory and application of public convenience and necessity and on the emergency medical system in the state.

(5)  The department shall maintain a roster of no less than five individuals who meet the minimum qualifications for both presiding and hearing officers and the standards set by the department.

(6)  The parties may mutually select an officer from the roster if the officer is available.

(7)  If the parties cannot agree upon an officer under Subsection (4), the department shall randomly select an officer from the roster or from a smaller group of the roster agreed upon by the applicant and the objecting interested parties.

